Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.025

Standards for appropriateness of physical therapy care—Violation.

Pursuant to the board's power in RCW 18.74.023(3), the board is directed to adopt rules relating to standards for appropriateness of physical therapy care. Violation of the standards adopted by rule under this section is unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW.

[ 1991 c 12 s 5.]